Utah statutes.
77-3-10.   Assault in presence of magistrate or court.

A person who, in the presence of the court or magistrate, assaults or threatens to assault another or to commit an offense against person or property, or who contends with another with threatening words, may be ordered by the court or magistrate to give security and if he refuses to do so, may be committed as provided in Subsection 77-3-8(2)(b).



Enacted by Chapter 15, 1980 General Session

